Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-5403
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Vacant Property Registration Act are to promote the health, safety, and welfare of Nebraska residents by providing authority for municipalities to enact vacant property registration ordinances. Such ordinances will allow communities to identify and register vacant properties, collect fees to compensate for the public costs of vacant properties, plan for the rehabilitation of vacant properties, and encourage the occupancy of vacant properties.

Laws 2018, LB256, § 3.